Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB519.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 701 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 701. Training of inspectors.* * *(l) Trainee classification.--(1) The department may, by regulation, establish a separate trainee classification for each certification category.(2) The trainee classification shall be considered optional for all individuals seeking certification under this act.1234567891011121314151617181920 (3) An applicant for trainee classification must secure the sponsorship of an individual certified in each category for which the trainee seeks certification. Each sponsor must be verified by an affidavit form provided by the department.(4) A trainee classification is nonrenewable and shall be limited to a:(i) Two-year time period for residential and accessibility certification categories.(ii) Three-year time period for all other certification categories.(5) Individuals with trainee classifications may learn the duties of a certified individual while under the supervision of a sponsor described in paragraph (3). On-the- job training shall occur under direct supervision by the sponsor or by an individual certified in the category of work that is the subject of the training. An inspector trainee may not conduct inspections unless the inspector trainee is accompanied by an individual certified in the category of work that is the subject of the training.(6) The department may establish fees and applications and registration procedures to establish the trainee classification system.(7) Individuals with trainee classifications shall be listed on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0519PN0512 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526